viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX pT Y 95
SFX pT oir oir/ oir  is:infi
SFX pT urseoir ursoyant/ seoir  is:ppre
SFX pT ursoir ursoyant/ soir  is:ppre
SFX pT urseoir ursis/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX pT urseoir ursise/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pT urseoir ursis·e/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pT urseoir ursises/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pT urseoir ursis·es/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT ursoir ursis/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX pT ursoir ursise/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pT ursoir ursis·e/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pT ursoir ursises/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pT ursoir ursis·es/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT urseoir ursois/ seoir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir ursoit/ seoir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir ursoyons/ seoir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoyez/ seoir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoient/ seoir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX pT ursoir ursois/ soir  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoit/ soir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoyons/ soir  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoyez/ soir  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoient/ soir  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoyais/ seoir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir ursoyait/ seoir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir ursoyions/ seoir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoyiez/ seoir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoyaient/ seoir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoyais/ soir  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoyait/ soir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoyions/ soir  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoyiez/ soir  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoyaient/ soir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pT urseoir ursis/ seoir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir ursit/ seoir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir ursîmes/ seoir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir ursîtes/ seoir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir ursirent/ seoir  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX pT ursoir ursis/ soir  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursit/ soir  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursîmes/ soir  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursîtes/ soir  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursirent/ soir  is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX pT urseoir urseoirai/ seoir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pT urseoir urseoiras/ seoir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir urseoira/ seoir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir urseoirons/ seoir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir urseoirez/ seoir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir urseoiront/ seoir  is:ifut is:3pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoirai/ soir  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoiras/ soir  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoira/ soir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoirons/ soir  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoirez/ soir  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoiront/ soir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pT urseoir urseoirais/ seoir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir urseoirait/ seoir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir urseoirions/ seoir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir urseoiriez/ seoir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir urseoiraient/ seoir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoirais/ soir  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoirait/ soir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoirions/ soir  is:cond is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoiriez/ soir  is:cond is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoiraient/ soir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoie/ seoir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir ursoies/ seoir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoie/ soir  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoies/ soir  is:spre is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir ursisse/ seoir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX pT urseoir ursisses/ seoir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir ursît/ seoir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX pT urseoir ursissions/ seoir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir ursissiez/ seoir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir ursissent/ seoir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX pT ursoir ursisse/ soir  is:simp is:1sg
SFX pT ursoir ursisses/ soir  is:simp is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursît/ soir  is:simp is:3sg
SFX pT ursoir ursissions/ soir  is:simp is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursissiez/ soir  is:simp is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursissent/ soir  is:simp is:3pl
SFX pT urseoir ursois/ seoir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX pT urseoir ursoyons/ seoir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX pT urseoir ursoyez/ seoir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX pT ursoir ursois/ soir  is:impe is:2sg
SFX pT ursoir ursoyons/ soir  is:impe is:1pl
SFX pT ursoir ursoyez/ soir  is:impe is:2pl
SFX pT urseoir ursis-e/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pT urseoir ursis-es/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT ursoir ursis-e/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pT ursoir ursis-es/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT urseoir ursis·e·s/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT ursoir ursis·e·s/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT urseoir ursis-e-s/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pT ursoir ursis-e-s/ soir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX pU Y 11
SFX pU eoir eoir/ seoir  is:infi
SFX pU eoir éant/ seoir  is:ppre
SFX pU eoir is/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX pU eoir ise/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX pU eoir is·e/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pU eoir ises/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX pU eoir is·es/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pU eoir is-e/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX pU eoir is-es/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pU eoir is·e·s/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX pU eoir is-e-s/ seoir  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX pV Y 14
SFX pV eoir eoir/ seoir  is:infi
SFX pV eoir éant/ seoir  is:ppre
SFX pV eoir eyant/ seoir  is:ppre
SFX pV eoir is/ seoir  is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX pV eoir ied/ seoir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pV eoir iéent/ seoir  is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pV eoir eyait/ seoir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pV eoir eyaient/ seoir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pV eoir iéra/ seoir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pV eoir iéront/ seoir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pV eoir iérait/ seoir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pV eoir iéraient/ seoir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pV eoir iée/ seoir  is:spre is:3sg
SFX pV eoir iéent/ seoir  is:spre is:3pl

SFX pW Y 23
SFX pW oir oir/ oir  is:infi
SFX pW sseoir sséant/ seoir  is:ppre
SFX pW ssoir sséant/ soir  is:ppre
SFX pW sseoir ssied/ seoir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pW sseoir ssiéent/ seoir  is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pW ssoir ssied/ soir  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pW ssoir ssiéent/ soir  is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pW sseoir sseyait/ seoir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pW sseoir sseyaient/ seoir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pW ssoir sseyait/ soir  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pW ssoir sseyaient/ soir  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pW sseoir ssiéra/ seoir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pW sseoir ssiéront/ seoir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pW ssoir ssiéra/ soir  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pW ssoir ssiéront/ soir  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX pW sseoir ssiérait/ seoir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pW sseoir ssiéraient/ seoir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pW ssoir ssiérait/ soir  is:cond is:3sg
SFX pW ssoir ssiéraient/ soir  is:cond is:3pl
SFX pW sseoir ssiée/ seoir  is:spre is:3sg
SFX pW sseoir ssiéent/ seoir  is:spre is:3pl
SFX pW ssoir ssiée/ soir  is:spre is:3sg
SFX pW ssoir ssiéent/ soir  is:spre is:3pl
